Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 2 CONTROL OF WATER POLLUTION AND SURFACE-WATER USE
12-5-30.1. Major spills by publicly owned treatment works.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Board" means the Board of Natural Resources.

"Consistently exceeding an effluent limitation" means a POTW's exceeding the POTW's assigned effluent limitation for at least five days out of each seven-day period during a total period of 180 consecutive days.

"Major spill" means the discharge of pollutants into the waters of this state by a POTW at a rate substantially exceeding the effluent limitation of the POTW, and such term shall be more specifically defined by regulations of the board.

"Monitoring" means the systematic measurement of chemical and biological pollutants present in waters of this state which are affected by a major spill or by consistently exceeding an effluent limitation.

"Publicly Owned Treatment Works" or "POTW" means the city, town, county, district, association, or other public body created by or pursuant to state law or federal law that owns and operates a treatment works and, where appropriate, shall include the treatment works and any sewers or other appurtenances that convey waste water to the treatment works.

By not later than January 1, 1990, the board shall provide by rules or regulations for the following:

For immediate notification to the division of a major spill by a POTW;

For the POTW responsible for the major spill to cause to be published in the legal organ of the county where the spill occurred a notice of such spill, such notice to be published within not more than seven days after the date of the spill;

For the division to provide notice of the major spill within 24 hours thereafter to every county, municipality, or other public agency whose public water supply is within a distance of 20 miles downstream and to any others which could potentially be affected by the spill.

For independent monitoring of waters affected by a major spill or by consistently exceeding an effluent limitation, with such monitoring being at the expense of the POTW, for a period of at least one year and for the results of such monitoring to be regularly provided to all counties, municipalities, and other public agencies using the affected waters as a source of public water supply.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-30.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1989, p. 280, § 1.)

12-5-30.2. Combined sewer overflow systems.

As used in this Code section, the term "combined sewer overflow" or "CSO" means a sewage system so designed or constructed as to allow surface-water runoff to enter the conduit carrying sewage, industrial waste, or other waste and, when such conduit exceeds its maximum capacity, allows a discharge which bypasses the normal treatment works integral to such sewage system and allows untreated or incompletely treated sewage, industrial waste, or other waste to flow, directly or indirectly, into the waters of the state.

After March 31, 1992, no person shall operate a CSO in this state unless he has obtained a permit to do so from the director. The director, under the conditions he prescribes, shall require the submission of such plans, specifications, and other information as he deems relevant in connection with the issuance of such permits. Compliance with permit limits shall be required for all CSO discharges under design conditions as determined by the director.

The director is authorized to require as conditions in permits issued under this Code section the achievement of effluent limitations established pursuant to this article. In imposing effluent limitations as conditions in such permits, the director shall base his determination upon the assessment of technology and processes unrelated to the quality of receiving waters of this state. Effluent limitations required as conditions of such permits shall be achieved in the shortest reasonable period of time consistent with state law and the Federal Water Pollution Control Act, as amended. The director is further authorized to set schedules of compliance and include such schedules within the terms and conditions of such permits for the operation of a CSO and to prescribe terms and conditions for such permits to assure compliance with applicable effluent limitations and water quality criteria established pursuant to this article, including, but not limited to, requirements concerning recording, reporting, monitoring, and inspection to the extent permissible under this article and such other requirements as are consistent with the purposes of this article.

Each permit issued pursuant to this Code section shall have a fixed term of five years and may be renewed by the director in accordance with such guidelines as he shall prescribe but only after the director has issued a written finding, based upon actual investigation, that the applicant has substantially followed any schedules of compliance established pursuant to subsection (c) of this Code section.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-30.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1201, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1386, § 2.)

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, substituted "bypasses" for "by-passes" in subsection (a).

12-5-30.3. Sludge land application systems.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Sludge" means the solid or semisolid residue generated at a waste-water treatment or pretreatment plant. Such term specifically excludes treated effluent, septage, and sludge that has been treated to further reduce pathogens by such processes as composting, heat drying, or heat treating.

"Sludge land application" means the placement of sludge on or under the ground surface for the purpose of sludge disposal, soil conditioning, or agricultural enhancement. Such term specifically excludes the disposal of sludge in a permitted landfill.

No person shall operate a sludge land application system without first securing the approval of the director. The director may include this approval and approval requirements in a permit issued under Code Section 12-5-30.

Prior to the issuance of any permit for a sludge land application system, the director shall require written verification to be furnished by the applicant that the proposed facility complies with applicable local zoning or land use ordinances, if any.

The Board of Natural Resources shall adopt technical regulations governing sludge land application and procedural regulations for approval of sludge land application systems, including public notice and public hearing requirements. All public hearings shall be conducted by the division and the applicant for the permit within the jurisdiction of the local governing authority where the proposed sludge land application site is located.

The local governing authority in which a sludge land application site is located may assess upon the generator of the sludge and the owner of the sludge land application site reasonable fees for environmental monitoring of the site and may hire persons to monitor the site. Payment of the assessed fee shall be made prior to the application of sludge. Failure to pay such fees, if assessed, shall be grounds for the local governing authority to seek an injunction to stop the land application of sludge. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to the land application of sludge which is generated by the treatment of industrial process waste water only.

Any person who violates this Code section, regulations adopted by the Board of Natural Resources pursuant to this Code section, or any permit or approval requirements of the director issued pursuant to this Code section shall be subject to the civil penalties and the criminal penalties contained in Code Sections

12-5-52

and

12-5-53

.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-30.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 730, § 1; Ga. L. 2014, p. 598, § 1/HB 741; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 12/HB 323.)

Law reviews.

-
For note on 1993 enactment of this Code section, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 65 (1993).

12-5-30.4. Establishment of water emergency response procedures.

Whenever any substance which would endanger the health or property of downstream users of the waters of this state is discharged into such waters, it shall be the duty of any person in charge of such substance to immediately notify the division of the location and nature of the discharge and to immediately take all reasonable steps to prevent injury to the health or property of such downstream users.

The division shall immediately conduct an initial investigation upon receiving any notification made pursuant to this Code section or subsection (a) of Code Section 12-14-3 or by a member of the public who observes an emergency situation or discharge to determine if such notification satisfies the criteria described in subsection (a) of this Code section.

If the division determines that there is a threat to the health or property of downstream users of the waters of this state, the division shall as soon as possible, but not more than 24 hours after such determination, notify and consult with the Georgia Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency, the appropriate local emergency management agency, the appropriate local county health department, and other appropriate divisions within the department as necessary to determine if it is necessary to prepare and distribute a public notice concerning such threat. Upon notification by the division, the local emergency management agency or the local county health department shall prepare and post such public notice through electronic media and print. Such public notice shall be located at places where the public regularly uses the waters of this state or seeks information about such waters.

The division shall ensure that immediate corrective action is initiated to the maximum extent practicable and as otherwise authorized by this title in order to prevent further danger to the health or property of downstream users.

The division shall establish a protocol, to be reviewed every five years, for coordinated responses to discharges that create emergency situations and shall coordinate with the appropriate emergency response agencies to provide for continual emergency response so as to most efficiently and effectively meet the needs of affected communities. The division may provide training to state and local emergency response agencies to further the purposes of this Code section.

Nothing in this Code section shall prevent any local governmental entity from taking any actions within its authority to protect public health.

The department shall promulgate any rules and regulations necessary to implement and administer this Code section on or before December 1, 2014.

(Code 1981, §

12-5-30.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2014, p. 176, § 1/HB 549; Ga. L. 2016, p. 91, § 1/SB 416.)